Nebraska, session 109, LB893.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB893 LB893
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 79-808, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-808 (1) The board shall establish, adopt, and promulgate
appropriate rules, regulations, and procedures governing the issuance,
renewal, conversion, suspension, and revocation of certificates and
permits to teach, provide special services, and administer based upon (a)
earned college credit in humanities, social and natural sciences,
mathematics, or career and technical education, (b) earned college
credit, or its equivalent in professional education, for particular
teaching, special services, or administrative assignments, (c) criminal
history record information if the applicant has not been a continuous
Nebraska resident for five years immediately preceding application for
the first issuance of a certificate, (d) human relations training or
interpersonal relations training, as applicable, (e) successful teaching,
administration, or provision of special services, and (f) moral, mental,
and physical fitness for teaching, all in accordance with sound
educational practices. Such rules, regulations, and procedures shall also
provide for endorsement requirements to indicate areas of specialization
on such certificates and permits. Such rules and regulations shall not
require any test of basic skills.
(2)(a) (2) The board may issue a temporary certificate, valid for a
period not to exceed two years, to any applicant for certification who
has not completed the human relations training requirement.
(b)(i) The board may issue a Nebraska substitute teacher's
certificate to an applicant who is otherwise qualified for such
certificate and who (i) has the required human relations training or (ii)
has completed the interpersonal relations training course and passed the
interpersonal relations training test as determined by the department
pursuant to subdivision (2)(b)(ii) of this section.
(ii) The State Department of Education shall create and make
available an online interpersonal relations training course and test that
-2-

LB893 LB893
2026 2026
covers topics similar in substance to the required human relations
training. Such course and test may be taken by individuals seeking a
substitute permit as an alternative to the required human relations
training. The department may charge a fee to individuals seeking to take
such course and test in an amount not to exceed the costs of providing
such services.
(3) Members of any advisory committee established by the board to
assist the board in teacher education and certification matters shall be
reimbursed for expenses as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177. Each
school district which has an employee who serves as a member of such
committee and which is required to hire a person to replace such member
during the member's attendance at meetings or activities of the committee
or any subcommittee thereof shall be reimbursed from the Certification
Fund for the expense it incurs from hiring a replacement. School
districts may excuse employees who serve on such advisory committees from
certain duties which conflict with any advisory committee duties.
Sec. 2. Original section 79-808, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-3-